Utah statutes.
17-27a-402.   Information and technical assistance from the state.
Each state official, department, and agency shall:
(1)  promptly deliver any data and information requested by a county, unless
the disclosure is prohibited by Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records
Access and Management Act; and
(2)  furnish any other technical assistance and advice that they have
available to the county without additional cost to the county.
